Hawaii statutes.
[§708-891.6] Computer fraud in the
third degree. (1) A person commits the offense of computer fraud in the
third degree if the person knowingly accesses a computer, computer system, or
computer network with the intent to commit the offense of theft in the third or
fourth degree.

(2) Computer fraud in the third degree is a
class C felony. [L 2012, c 293, §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next